District of Columbia statutes.
21-306

Other transfers by fiduciary.

(a)

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or to a trust company, as custodian, for the benefit of a minor pursuant to section 21-309, in the absence of a will or under a will or trust that does not contain an authorization to do so.

(b)

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or to a trust company, as custodian, for the benefit of the minor pursuant to section 21-309.

(c)

A transfer under subsection (a) or (b) of this section may be made only if the following occur:

(1)

The personal representative, the trustee, or the conservator considers the transfer to be in the best interests of the minor;

(2)

The transfer is not prohibited by or inconsistent with the provisions of the applicable will, trust agreement, or other governing instrument; and

(3)

The transfer is authorized by the court if it exceeds $10,000 in value.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
This section is referenced in § 21-307 and § 21-320.
1981 Ed., § 21-306.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.